Tennessee, session 114, HB2424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-1609, is amended by deleting
"shall notify" in the second sentence and substituting instead "shall notify in writing".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2424
012626
- 1 -